data/hunspell-cat/catalan-valencia.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: adossar
SFX 05 Y 84
SFX 05 r r/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 05 r nt/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 05 r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 05 r da/_Y ar
SFX 05 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 05 r des/_Y ar
SFX 05 ar o/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 05 ossar òs/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 05 r 0/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 05 r m/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 05 r u/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 05 r va/_Z ar
SFX 05 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 05 r va/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 05 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar í/_Z ar
SFX 05 r res/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar à/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 05 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 05 r ré/_Z ar
SFX 05 r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 05 r rà/_Z ar
SFX 05 r rem/_Z ar
SFX 05 r reu/_Z ar
SFX 05 r ran/_Z ar
SFX 05 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 05 r ries/_Z ar
SFX 05 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 05 r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 05 r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 05 r rien/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar is/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar in/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 05 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar essis/_Z ar
SFX 05 r res/_Z ar
SFX 05 r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar esses/_Z ar
SFX 05 r sses/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 05 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar éssim/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar éssem/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar éssiu/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar ésseu/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar essin/_Z ar
SFX 05 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 05 r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 05 ar essen/_Z ar
SFX 05 r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 05 r 0/_D ar
SFX 05 ar e/_D ar
SFX 05 ar i/_D ar
SFX 05 ar em/_C ar
SFX 05 r u/_C ar
SFX 05 ar eu/_C ar
SFX 05 ar en/_C ar
SFX 05 ar in/_C ar

# Model de conjugació: anquilosar
SFX 06 Y 84
SFX 06 r r/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 06 r nt/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 06 r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 06 r da/_Y ar
SFX 06 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 06 r des/_Y ar
SFX 06 ar o/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 06 osar òs/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 06 r 0/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 06 r m/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 06 r u/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 06 r va/_Z ar
SFX 06 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 06 r va/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 06 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar í/_Z ar
SFX 06 r res/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar à/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 06 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 06 r ré/_Z ar
SFX 06 r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 06 r rà/_Z ar
SFX 06 r rem/_Z ar
SFX 06 r reu/_Z ar
SFX 06 r ran/_Z ar
SFX 06 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 06 r ries/_Z ar
SFX 06 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 06 r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 06 r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 06 r rien/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar is/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar in/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 06 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar essis/_Z ar
SFX 06 r res/_Z ar
SFX 06 r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar esses/_Z ar
SFX 06 r sses/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 06 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar éssim/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar éssem/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar éssiu/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar ésseu/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar essin/_Z ar
SFX 06 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 06 r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 06 ar essen/_Z ar
SFX 06 r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 06 r 0/_D ar
SFX 06 ar e/_D ar
SFX 06 ar i/_D ar
SFX 06 ar em/_C ar
SFX 06 r u/_C ar
SFX 06 ar eu/_C ar
SFX 06 ar en/_C ar
SFX 06 ar in/_C ar

# Model de conjugació: anul·lar
SFX 07 Y 84
SFX 07 r r/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 07 r nt/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 07 r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 07 r da/_Y ar
SFX 07 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 07 r des/_Y ar
SFX 07 ar o/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 07 ·lar 0/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 07 r 0/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 07 r m/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 07 r u/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 07 r va/_Z ar
SFX 07 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 07 r va/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 07 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar í/_Z ar
SFX 07 r res/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar à/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 07 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 07 r ré/_Z ar
SFX 07 r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 07 r rà/_Z ar
SFX 07 r rem/_Z ar
SFX 07 r reu/_Z ar
SFX 07 r ran/_Z ar
SFX 07 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 07 r ries/_Z ar
SFX 07 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 07 r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 07 r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 07 r rien/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar is/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar in/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 07 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar essis/_Z ar
SFX 07 r res/_Z ar
SFX 07 r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar esses/_Z ar
SFX 07 r sses/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 07 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar éssim/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar éssem/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar éssiu/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar ésseu/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar essin/_Z ar
SFX 07 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 07 r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 07 ar essen/_Z ar
SFX 07 r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 07 r 0/_D ar
SFX 07 ar e/_D ar
SFX 07 ar i/_D ar
SFX 07 ar em/_C ar
SFX 07 r u/_C ar
SFX 07 ar eu/_C ar
SFX 07 ar en/_C ar
SFX 07 ar in/_C ar

# Model de conjugació: cantar
SFX 08 Y 84
SFX 08 r r/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 08 r nt/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 08 r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 08 r da/_Y ar
SFX 08 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 08 r des/_Y ar
SFX 08 ar o/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar 0/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 08 r 0/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 08 r m/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 08 r u/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 08 r va/_Z ar
SFX 08 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 08 r va/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 08 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar í/_Z ar
SFX 08 r res/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar à/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 08 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 08 r ré/_Z ar
SFX 08 r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 08 r rà/_Z ar
SFX 08 r rem/_Z ar
SFX 08 r reu/_Z ar
SFX 08 r ran/_Z ar
SFX 08 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 08 r ries/_Z ar
SFX 08 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 08 r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 08 r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 08 r rien/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar is/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar in/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 08 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar essis/_Z ar
SFX 08 r res/_Z ar
SFX 08 r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar esses/_Z ar
SFX 08 r sses/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 08 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar éssim/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar éssem/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar éssiu/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar ésseu/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar essin/_Z ar
SFX 08 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 08 r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 08 ar essen/_Z ar
SFX 08 r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 08 r 0/_D ar
SFX 08 ar e/_D ar
SFX 08 ar i/_D ar
SFX 08 ar em/_C ar
SFX 08 r u/_C ar
SFX 08 ar eu/_C ar
SFX 08 ar en/_C ar
SFX 08 ar in/_C ar
